Massachusetts, session 194th, H5294.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, and
notwithstanding any other provision of the Zoning Bylaws to the contrary, there hereby is a
moratorium on any and all applications for Large Scale Ground-Mounted Solar Photovoltaic
Installations and/or Battery Energy Storage Systems, which moratorium shall not apply for
residential installations. The moratorium shall be in effect for one year after the adoption of this
special act or the date on which the Town adopts amendments to the Town’s Zoning Bylaws
concerning regulation of Ground-Mounted Solar Photovoltaic Installations and/or Battery
Energy Storage Systems, whichever occurs earlier. During the moratorium period, the Town
shall undertake a planning process to study, review, analyze, and address what revisions to the
Zoning Bylaws relative to Industrial Large Scale Ground Solar Photovoltaic Installations and/or
Battery Energy Storage Systems are needed or desirable to allow for and regulate such use
of 2

consistent with applicable law while protecting the Town’s ecological resources and furthering
its planning goals.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2